apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.ca.dix
   <pardef n="caf/è__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ès</l>
          <r>è<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>és</l>
          <r>è<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>è</l>
          <r>è<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>è<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="av/ís__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isos</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ís</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="env/às__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asos</l>
          <r>às<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>às</l>
          <r>às<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
 <pardef n="capat/às__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>assos</l>
          <r>às<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>às</l>
          <r>às<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="calab/ós__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ossos</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="antic/òs__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ossos</l>
          <r>òs<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òs</l>
          <r>òs<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="impr/ès__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esos</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ès</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="paraig/ua__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ües</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="pres__n">  

  <e>
    <p>
      <l/>
      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>
  
  <e>
    <p>
      <l>os</l>
      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>
  
  <e>
    <p>
      <l>a</l>
      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>
  
  <e>
    <p>
      <l>eses</l>
      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>
</pardef>

    <pardef n="alacant/í__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="angl/ès__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eses</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esa</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esos</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ès</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>és</l>
          <r>ès<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="andal/ús__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usa</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usos</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ús</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="sacerdot__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esses</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="pr/íncep__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inceses</l>
          <r>íncep<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>incesa</l>
          <r>íncep<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ínceps</l>
          <r>íncep<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íncep</l>
          <r>íncep<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="s/oci__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òcies</l>
          <r>oci<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òcia</l>
          <r>oci<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ocis</l>
          <r>oci<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oci</l>
          <r>oci<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="m/arge__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arges</l>
          <r>arge<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>àrgens</l>
          <r>arge<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arge</l>
          <r>arge<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="cert/amen__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>àmens</l>
          <r>amen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amen</l>
          <r>amen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="administrati/u__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="sospit/ós__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oses</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osa</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osos</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 </pardef>

<e lm="cafè"><i>caf</i><par n="caf/è__n"/></e>
<e lm="compromís"><i>comprom</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="envàs"><i>env</i><par n="env/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="cosí"><i>cos</i><par n="alacant/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="ballarí"><i>ballar</i><par n="alacant/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="marge"><i>m</i><par n="m/arge__n"/></e>
<e lm="examen"><i>ex</i><par n="cert/amen__n"/></e>
<e lm="executiu"><i>executi</i><par n="administrati/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="fracàs"><i>frac</i><par n="capat/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="pagès"><i>pag</i><par n="angl/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="embós"><i>emb</i><par n="calab/ós__n"/></e>
<e lm="avís"><i>av</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="esbós"><i>esb</i><par n="calab/ós__n"/></e>
<e lm="soci"><i>s</i><par n="s/oci__n"/></e>
<e lm="permís"><i>perm</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="sacerdot"><i>sacerdot</i><par n="sacerdot__n"/></e>
<e lm="príncep"><i>pr</i><par n="pr/íncep__n"/></e>
<e lm="pres"><i>pres</i><par n="pres__n"/></e>
<e lm="reclús"><i>recl</i><par n="andal/ús__n"/></e>
<e lm="arròs"><i>arr</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="sospitós"><i>sospit</i><par n="sospit/ós__n"/></e>
<e lm="fideïcomís"><i>fideïcom</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="paraigua"><i>paraig</i><par n="paraig/ua__n"/></e>
<e lm="endós"><i>end</i><par n="calab/ós__n"/></e>
<e lm="pelegrí"><i>pelegr</i><par n="alacant/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="parxís"><i>parx</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="promès"><i>prom</i><par n="angl/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="manganès"><i>mangan</i><par n="impr/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="extradós"><i>extrad</i><par n="calab/ós__n"/></e>
<e lm="paradís"><i>parad</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="gessamí"><i>gessam</i><par n="alacant/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="gimnàs"><i>gimn</i><par n="env/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="duramen"><i>dur</i><par n="cert/amen__n"/></e>
<e lm="contrapès"><i>contrap</i><par n="impr/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="anticòs"><i>antic</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="sirventès"><i>sirvent</i><par n="impr/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="heteroanticòs"><i>heteroantic</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="al·loanticòs"><i>al·loantic</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="marès"><i>mar</i><par n="impr/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="consoci"><i>cons</i><par n="s/oci__n"/></e>
<e lm="aiguarràs"><i>aiguarr</i><par n="env/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="captiu"><i>capti</i><par n="administrati/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="domàs"><i>dom</i><par n="capat/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="assassí"><i>assass</i><par n="alacant/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="isoanticòs"><i>isoantic</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="terròs"><i>terr</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="matalàs"><i>matal</i><par n="capat/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="intrús"><i>intr</i><par n="andal/ús__n"/></e>
<e lm="embaràs"><i>embar</i><par n="capat/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="capgròs"><i>capgr</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="narcís"><i>narc</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="tornavís"><i>tornav</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="malentès"><i>malent</i><par n="impr/ès__n"/></e>
<e lm="esclau"><i>escla</i><par n="administrati/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="biogàs"><i>biog</i><par n="env/às__n"/></e>
<e lm="matís"><i>mat</i><par n="av/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="autoanticòs"><i>autoantic</i><par n="antic/òs__n"/></e>
<e lm="intradós"><i>intrad</i><par n="calab/ós__n"/></e>
<e lm="colós"><i>col</i><par n="calab/ós__n"/></e>
<e lm="damasquí"><i>damasqu</i><par n="alacant/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="fugitiu"><i>fugiti</i><par n="administrati/u__n"/></e>
